Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-103 License required. (a) A
person shall not sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance in this State for any
line, class, or classes of insurance unless the person is licensed for the
proper line of authority or class in accordance with this article.

(b) The proper line of authority for which a
producer is required to be licensed relative to sale, solicitation, or
negotiation of any class or type of insurance set forth in sections 431:1-204
to 431:1-211 is set forth in the following table:

Class Required
Line of Authority

Life Life

Accident and Health or Accident and
Health or

Sickness Sickness

Property Property

Marine and Transportation Casualty and
Property

Vehicle Casualty and
Property

General Casualty Casualty

Surety Surety

Title Title

(c) Sale, solicitation, or negotiation of
variable life and variable annuity products requires licensing in the variable
life and variable annuity products line of authority.

(d) Sale, solicitation, or negotiation of
personal lines insurance requires licensing in the personal lines line of
authority or the property and casualty lines of authority.

(e) Sale, solicitation, or negotiation of
limited lines insurance, including limited line credit and limited line travel
insurance, is permitted pursuant to section 431:9A-107.5. [L 2001, c 216, pt of
§2; am L 2002, c 155, §27; am L 2003, c 212, §56]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next